Missouri, session 2026, HB2712.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 281.260, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 281.260, to read as follows:
281.260. 1. Every pesticide which is distributed, sold, offered for sale or held for sale
within this state, or which is delivered for transportation or transported in intrastate commerce
or between points within this state through any point outside of this state, shall be registered
in the office of the director, and the registration shall be renewed annually.
2. The registrant shall file with the director a statement including:
(1) The name and address of the registrant and the name and address of the person
whose name will appear on the label, if other than the registrant;
(2) The name of the pesticide;
(3) Classification of the pesticide; and
(4) A complete copy of the labeling accompanying the pesticide and a statement of all
claims to be made for it, including directions for use.
3. The registrant shall pay an annual fee of two hundred dollars for each product
registered in any calendar year or part thereof. The fee shall be deposited in the state treasury
to the credit of the agriculture protection fund created in section 261.200 to be used solely to
administer the pest and pesticide programs of the department of agriculture. The director may
deposit up to seven percent of the fee in the pesticide education fund under section 281.265.
If the funding exceeds the reasonable costs to administer the programs as set forth herein, the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2712 2
department of agriculture shall reduce fees for all registrants if the fees derived exceed the
reasonable cost of administering the pest and pesticide programs of the department of
agriculture. All such registrations shall expire on December thirty-first of any one year, unless
sooner cancelled. A registration for a special local need pursuant to subsection 6 of this
section, which is disapproved by the federal government, shall expire on the effective date of
the disapproval.
4. Any registration approved by the director and in effect on the thirty-first day of
December for which a renewal application has been made and the proper fee paid shall
continue in full force and effect until such time as the director notifies the applicant that the
registration has been renewed, or otherwise denied, in accord with the provisions of
subsection 9 of this section. Forms for reregistration shall be mailed to registrants at least
ninety days prior to the expiration date.
5. If the renewal of a pesticide registration is not filed prior to January first of any one
year, an additional fee of fifty dollars shall be assessed and added to the original fee and shall
be paid by the applicant before the registration renewal for that pesticide shall be issued;
provided, that, such additional fee shall not apply if the applicant furnishes an affidavit
certifying that he or she did not distribute such unregistered pesticide during the period of
nonregistration. The payment of such additional fee is not a bar to any prosecution for doing
business without proper registry. The fee shall be credited to the agriculture protection fund
created under section 261.200 to be used solely to administer the pest and pesticide programs
of the department of agriculture. If the funding exceeds the reasonable cost to administer the
programs as set forth herein, the department of agriculture shall reduce fees for all registrants
if the fees derived exceed the reasonable cost of administering the pest and pesticide
programs of the department of agriculture.
6. Provided the state complies with requirements of the federal government to register
pesticides to meet special local needs, the director shall require that registrants comply with
sections 281.210 to 281.310 and pertinent federal laws and regulations. Where two or more
pesticides meet the requirements of this subsection, one shall not be registered in preference
to the other.
7. The director may require the submission of the complete formula of any pesticide
to approve or deny product registration. If it appears to the director that the composition and
efficacy of the pesticide is such as to warrant the proposed claims for it and if the pesticide
and its labeling and other material required to be submitted comply with the requirements of
sections 281.210 to 281.310, he or she shall register the pesticide.
8. Provided the state is authorized to issue experimental use permits, the director may:
(1) Issue an experimental use permit to any person applying for an experimental use
permit if he or she determines that the applicant needs such permit in order to accumulate

HB 2712 3
information necessary to register a pesticide under sections 281.210 to 281.310. An
application for an experimental use permit may be filed at the time of or before or after an
application for registration is filed;
(2) Prescribe terms, conditions, and period of time for the experimental permit which
shall be under the supervision of the director;
(3) Revoke any experimental permit, at any time, if he or she finds that its terms or
conditions are being violated, or that its terms and conditions are inadequate to avoid
unreasonable adverse effects on the environment.
9. If it does not appear to the director that the pesticide is such as to warrant the
proposed claims for it or if the pesticide and its labeling and other material required to be
submitted do not comply with the provisions of sections 281.210 to 281.310 or with federal
laws, he or she shall notify the registrant of the manner in which the pesticide, labeling, or
other material required to be submitted fail to comply with sections 281.210 to 281.310 or
with federal laws so as to afford the registrant an opportunity to make the necessary
corrections. If, upon receipt of such notice, the registrant insists that such corrections are not
necessary and requests in writing that the pesticide be registered or, in the case of a pesticide
that is already registered, that it not be cancelled, the director, within ninety days, shall hold a
public hearing to determine if the pesticide in question should be registered or cancelled. If,
after such hearing, it is determined that the pesticide should not be registered or that its
registration should be cancelled, the director may refuse registration or cancel an existing
registration until the required label changes are accomplished. If the pesticide is shown to be
in compliance with sections 281.210 to 281.310 and federal laws, the pesticide will be
registered. Any appeals resulting from administrative decisions by the director will be taken
in accordance with sections 536.100 to 536.140.
10. For any pesticide registered by the United States Environmental Protection
Agency under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (FIFRA); a
pesticide label approved by the United States Environmental Protection Agency; or
consistent with the United States Environmental Protection Agency carcinogenicity
classification of the pesticide under FIFRA shall be sufficient to satisfy any requirement
for a warning label regarding cancer under any other provision of current law. Nothing
in this subsection shall be construed to grant full immunity from liability to pesticide
manufacturers in the state.
11. Notwithstanding any other provision of sections 281.210 to 281.310, registration
is not required in the case of a pesticide shipped from one plant or warehouse within this state
to another plant or warehouse within this state when such plants are operated by the same
persons.

HB 2712 4
[11.] 12. The director shall not make any lack of essentiality a criterion for denying
registration of a pesticide except where none of the labeled uses are present in the state.
Where two or more pesticides meet the requirements of sections 281.210 to 281.310, one
shall not be registered in preference to the other.
[12.] 13. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the director may
allow a reasonable period of time for the retailer to dispose of existing stocks of pesticides
after the manufacturer or distributor has ceased to register the product with the state. The
method of disposal shall be determined by the director.
✔